South Dakota, session 2026, HB1300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 24-14:
The provisions of § 24-14-4 do not apply to an applicant who is a victim of human
trafficking or domestic abuse. To be recognized as a victim of human trafficking or
domestic abuse, the individual shall submit to the Board of Pardons and Paroles:
(1) An affidavit of the individual stating that:
(a) The individual is a victim of:
(i) Human trafficking under chapter 22-49;
(ii) Domestic abuse, as defined in § 25-10-1; or
(iii) A similar crime in another state that, if committed in this state,
would be considered human trafficking or domestic abuse; and
(b) The individual's safety is at risk if any personal information is published in
any newspaper; and
(2) The affidavit of two professionals stating that, based on the professional's work
with the individual, the professional believes the individual is a victim of human
trafficking or domestic abuse as set forth in subdivision (1), and the professional
believes the individual has a good faith belief that the individual's safety is at risk.
The professionals, who may be from the same profession but may not be from the
same agency, must be any two of the following:
(a) A law enforcement officer;
(b) A prosecutor;
(c) A parole agent;
(d) A qualified mental health professional;
(e) A licensed health care provider;

26.853.11 2 1300
(f) An addiction counseling or prevention services practitioner; or
(g) A social worker, crisis counselor, or other advocate acting on behalf of an
agency that assists victims of human trafficking or domestic abuse.
Nothing in this section waives a victim's right to notification as set forth in S.D.
Const., Art. VI, § 29, chapter 23A-28C, or any other applicable victim's rights law.
HB1300 ENROLLED

26.853.11 3 1300
An Act to except victims of human trafficking or domestic abuse from certain clemency notice
requirements.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1300
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1300 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1300 ENROLLED